Utah statutes.
78B-18-103.   Applicability.
(1)  This chapter applies to an unsworn declaration by a declarant who at the
time of making the declaration is physically located outside the boundaries of
the United States whether or not the location is subject to the jurisdiction
of the United States.
(2)  This chapter does not apply to a declaration by a declarant who is
physically located on property that is within the boundaries of the United
States and subject to the jurisdiction of another country or a federally
recognized Indian tribe.
